test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-kuaddhjed_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - kuâđđjed: # Verb 'to jump, momentanious' - full paradigm
     kuâđđjed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuâđđjam
     kuâđđjed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kuâđđjak
     kuâđđjed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuâđđai
     kuâđđjed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kuâđđjep
     kuâđđjed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kuâđđjeʹped
     kuâđđjed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kuâđđje 
     kuâđđjed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: kuâđđjet 
     kuâđđjed+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kuõđđu

     kuâđđjed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kuâđđjem
     kuâđđjed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kuâđđjiǩ
     kuâđđjed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kuâđđji
     kuâđđjed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [kuâđđjim, kuâđđjin, kuâđđjiim, kuâđđjiin]
     kuâđđjed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [kuâđđjid, kuâđđjiid]
     kuâđđjed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kuâđđje
     kuâđđjed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: kuâđđješ
     kuâđđjed+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: [kuâđđjam, kuâđđjamma]

     kuâđđjed+V+Pot+Sg1: kuâđđjeʹžem
     kuâđđjed+V+Pot+Sg2: kuâđđjeʹžiǩ
     kuâđđjed+V+Pot+Sg3: kuâđđjež
     kuâđđjed+V+Pot+Pl1: [kuâđđjeʹžep, kuâđđjeʹžim, kuâđđjeʹžin]
     kuâđđjed+V+Pot+Pl2: kuâđđjeʹžid 
     kuâđđjed+V+Pot+Pl3: kuâđđjeʹže
     kuâđđjed+V+Pot+Sg4: kuâđđjeʹžet
     kuâđđjed+V+Pot+ConNeg: kuâđđjeʹže

     kuâđđjed+V+Cond+Sg1: kuâđđjeʹčem
     kuâđđjed+V+Cond+Sg2: [kuâđđjeʹčiǩ, kuâđđjeʹčeǩ]
     kuâđđjed+V+Cond+Sg3: kuâđđjeʹči
     kuâđđjed+V+Cond+Pl1: [kuâđđjeʹčim, kuâđđjeʹčin, kuâđđjeʹčep]
     kuâđđjed+V+Cond+Pl2: kuâđđjeʹčid
     kuâđđjed+V+Cond+Pl3: kuâđđjeʹče
     kuâđđjed+V+Cond+Sg4: kuâđđjeʹčeš
     kuâđđjed+V+Cond+ConNeg: kuâđđjeʹče

     kuâđđjed+V+Imprt+Sg2: kuõđđu
     kuâđđjed+V+Imprt+Sg3: kuâđđjââǥǥas
     kuâđđjed+V+Imprt+Pl1: kuâđđjâkap
     kuâđđjed+V+Imprt+Pl2: kuâđđjeʹǩed
     kuâđđjed+V+Imprt+Pl3: kuâđđjâkaz
     kuâđđjed+V+Imprt+ConNeg: kuõđđu
     kuâđđjed+V+Imprt+ConNegII: kuâđđjuku

     kuâđđjed+V+Inf: kuâđđjed    
     kuâđđjed+V+Actio+Ess: kuâđđjeʹmmen
     kuâđđjed+V+Actio: kuâđđjem
     kuâđđjed+V+Act+PrsPrc: kuâđđjeei
     kuâđđjed+V+Act+PrfPrc: [kuâđđjam, kuâđđjamma]
     kuâđđjed+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [kuâđđjummu, kuâđđjum]
     kuâđđjed+V+VAbess: [kuâđđjeǩâni, kuâđđjeǩeânai, kuâđđjeǩânai, kuâđđjeǩenai, kuâđđjeǩani, kuâđđjekani, kuâđđjekâni, kuâđđjeǩeânnai]
     kuâđđjed+V+Ger+Ess: kuâđđjeeʹn
     kuâđđjed+V+Ger+Instr: kuâđđjeeʹl
